Maine, session 132, LD1458.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §482, sub-§1-B is enacted to read:
1-B. Average value of undeveloped land. "Average value of undeveloped land" has
the same meaning as in Title 36, section 578, subsection 1, paragraph C, subparagraph (3).
Sec. 2. 38 MRSA §482, sub-§9 is enacted to read:
9. Undeveloped land. "Undeveloped land" has the same meaning as in Title 36,
section 578, subsection 1, paragraph C, subparagraph (2).
Sec. 3. 38 MRSA §484, sub-§3, ¶K is enacted to read:
K. In making a determination under this subsection regarding the impact to existing
natural resources, the department may consider only the impact on the following
wildlife habitats, as defined in rules adopted by the department:
(1) High-value and moderate-value deer wintering habitat;
(2) The habitat of any species declared by the Commissioner of Inland Fisheries
and Wildlife or the director of the United States Fish and Wildlife Service to be
threatened or endangered;
(3) Seabird nesting islands;
(4) Significant vernal pools;
(5) High and moderate value inland waterfowl and wading bird habitat; and
(6) Shorebird nesting, feeding and staging areas.
The department may not include large undeveloped habitat blocks, as defined in rule,
as a wildlife habitat.
Sec. 4. 38 MRSA §484-D, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 448, §2, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
2. Calculating compensation fee. The department shall establish a compensation fee
amount equal to the average value of undeveloped land occupied by a renewable energy
development. A portion of the fee may be used to cover the cost of administering the receipt
and deposit of compensation fees pursuant to subsection 3.
The fee may not include compensation for an area:
A. As defined by section 480-Z, subsection 7;
B. Located in a designated growth area in a municipal comprehensive plan in
accordance with Title 30-A, section 4349-A, subsection 1, paragraph A; or
C. On a brownfield or a property contaminated by PFAS, as defined in Title 32, section
1732, subsection 5-A.
Sec. 5. 38 MRSA §484-D, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 448, §2, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
3. Disposition of compensation fees. The department shall deposit compensation
fees received under this section in the Land for Maine's Future Trust Fund established in
Title 5, section 6203-D.
Page 1 - 132LR1194(01)

Sec. 6. 38 MRSA §484-D, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 448, §2, is amended
to read:
6. Rules. The department shall adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this section.
Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are major substantive routine technical rules
under Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.